Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.065

Change in form of corporate trustee.

Any appointment of a specific bank, trust company, or corporation as trustee is conclusively presumed to authorize the appointment or continued service of that entity's successor in interest in the event of a merger, acquisition, or reorganization, and no court proceeding is necessary to affirm the appointment or continuance of service.

[ 1985 c 30 s 49. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 78.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.